Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB418.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of August 31, 1971 (P.L.398, No.96), known as the County Pension Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 30.1. County Employees' Defined Contribution Plan.--(a) The County Employees' Defined Contribution Plan is established. The board shall administer and manage the plan which shall be a defined contribution plan exclusively for the benefit of those county employes who participate in the plan and their beneficiaries within the meaning of and in conformity with IRC § 401(a). The board shall determine the terms and provisions of the plan not inconsistent with this act, the IRC or other applicable law and shall provide for the plan's administration.12345678910111213141516171819 (b) The County Employees' Defined Contribution Trust is established as part of the plan. The trust shall be comprised of the individual investment accounts and all assets and money in those accounts, and any assets and money held by the board as part of the plan that are not allocated to individual investment accounts. The members of the board shall be the trustees of the trust, which shall be administered exclusively for the benefit of those county employes who participate in the plan and their beneficiaries within the meaning of and in conformity with IRC § 401(a). The board shall determine the terms and provisions of the trust not inconsistent with this act, the IRC or other applicable law and shall provide for the investment and administration of the trust.(c) All assets and income in the plan that have been or shall be withheld or contributed by the participants, the county and other employers in accordance with this act shall be held in trust in any funding vehicle permitted by the applicable provisions of the IRC for the exclusive benefit of the participants and their beneficiaries until such time as the funds are distributed to the participants or their beneficiaries in accordance with the terms of the plan document. The assets of the plan held in trust for the exclusive benefit of the participants and their beneficiaries may be used for the payment of the fees, costs and expenses related to the administration and investment of the plan and the trust.(d) The board shall specify the terms and provisions of the plan and trust in a document containing the terms and conditions of the plan and in a trust declaration that shall be published in the county records. Any amendment to the plan and trust declaration also shall be published.20250HB0418PN0393 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) The board shall establish in the trust an individual investment account for each participant in the plan. All contributions by a participant or an employer for or on behalf of a participant shall be credited to the participant's individual investment account, together with all interest and investment earnings and losses. Investment and administrative fees, costs and expenses shall be charged to the participants' individual investment accounts except as otherwise provided under this act or as the county otherwise provides by appropriations from the county general fund. Employer defined contributions shall be recorded and accounted for separately from participant contributions, but all interest, investment earnings and losses, and investment and administrative fees, costs and expenses shall be allocated proportionately.(f) (1) A participant shall make mandatory pickup participant contributions through payroll deductions to the participant's individual investment account equal to a rate as determined by the board. The employer shall cause those contributions for current service to be made and deducted from each payroll or on such schedule as established by the board.(2) A participant may make voluntary contributions through payroll deductions, through direct trustee-to-trustee transfers, or through transfers of money received in an eligible rollover into the trust to the extent allowed by IRC § 402. The rollovers shall be made in a form and manner as determined by the board, shall be credited to the participant's individual investment account and shall be separately accounted for by the board.(3) No contributions may be allowed that would cause a violation of the limitations related to contributions applicable to governmental plans contained in IRC § 415 or in other 20250HB0418PN0393 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of law. In the event that any disallowed contributions are made, any participant contributions in excess of the limitations and investment earnings on those contributions, but minus investment fees and administrative charges, shall be refunded to the participant by the board.(g) (1) The contributions to the trust required to be made under subsection (f)(1) with respect to county service rendered by an active participant shall be picked up by the county and shall be treated as the employer's contribution for purposes of IRC § 414(h). After the effective date of this subsection, an employer employing a participant in the plan shall pick up the required mandatory participant contributions by a reduction in the compensation of the participant.(2) For all other purposes under this act and otherwise, mandatory pickup participant contributions shall be treated as contributions made by a participant in the same manner and to the same extent as if the contributions were made directly by the participant and not picked up.(h) (1) The county of an active participant shall make employer defined contributions for service of an active participant that shall be credited to the active participant's individual investment account. Employer defined contributions shall be recorded and accounted for separately from participant contributions.(2) No contributions may be allowed that would cause a violation of the limitations related to contributions applicable to governmental plans contained in IRC § 415 or in other provisions of law. In the event that any disallowed contributions are made, any employer defined contributions in excess of the limitations and investment earnings on the 20250HB0418PN0393 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contributions, but minus investment fees and administrative charges, shall be refunded to the employer by the board.(i) (1) A participant who terminates county service shall be eligible to withdraw the vested accumulated total defined contributions standing to the participant's credit in the participant's individual investment account or a lesser amount as the participant may request. Payment shall be made in a lump sum unless the board has established other forms of distribution in the plan document. A participant who withdraws the participant's vested accumulated total defined contributions shall no longer be a participant in the plan, notwithstanding that the former county employe may continue to be a member of the system or may have contracted to receive an annuity or other form of payment from a provider retained by the board for those purposes.(2) All payments under this subsection shall start and be made in compliance with the minimum distribution requirements and incidental death benefit rules of IRC § 401(a)(9). The board shall take any action and make any distributions it may determine are necessary to comply with those requirements.(3) (Reserved).(4) A county employe must be terminated from all positions that result in either membership in the system or participation in the plan to be eligible to receive a distribution. No distribution shall be allowed that would be an in-service distribution prohibited by the IRC.(5) Loans or other distributions, including hardship or unforeseeable emergency distributions, from the plan to county employes who have not terminated county service are not permitted, except as required by law.20250HB0418PN0393 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) A participant who terminates county service and whose vested accumulated total defined contributions are below the threshold established by law as of the date of termination of service may be paid the vested accumulated total defined contributions in a lump sum under IRC § 401(a)(31).(7) Except as prohibited by the IRC or as otherwise provided in this act, a participant who is eligible and elects to receive a distribution or vested accumulated employer defined contributions may purchase an annuity with that distribution from an annuity provider contracted by the board under subsection (j)(3) and under any conditions in the plan document. The conditions may include that the board is authorized to make the distribution directly to the annuity provider.(j) (1) In the event of the death of an active participant or inactive participant, the board shall pay to the participant's beneficiary the vested balance in the participant's individual investment account in a lump sum or in another manner as the board may establish in the plan document.(2) In the event of the death of a participant receiving distributions, the board shall pay to the participant's beneficiary the vested balance in the participant's individual investment account in a lump sum or in another manner as the board may establish in the plan document or, if the board has established alternative methods of distribution in the plan document under which the participant was receiving distributions, to the participant's beneficiary or successor payee, as the case may be, under the plan document.(3) The board shall contract with financial institutions, insurance companies or other types of third-party providers to allow a participant, beneficiary or successor payee who receives 20250HB0418PN0393 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a lump sum distribution to receive payments and death benefits in a form and manner as provided by the contract. To the extent commercially available, any annuity option shall include an interest rate of at least two and one-half per cent compounded annually.(k) Subject to any applicable forfeiture and attachment provisions of law, a participant shall be vested immediately with respect to all mandatory pickup participant contributions and voluntary contributions paid by or on behalf of the participant to the trust in addition to interest and investment gains or losses on the participant contributions but minus investment fees and administrative charges.(l) (1) The board may perform an annual or more frequent review of any qualified fund manager for the purpose of assuring that the fund manager continues to meet all standards and criteria established.(2) The board may allow for eligible rollovers and direct trustee-to-trustee transfers into the trust from qualified plans of other employers, regardless of whether the employers are private employers or public employers.(3) The board may allow an inactive participant to maintain the participant's individual investment account within the plan.(4) The board shall administer or ensure the administration of the plan in compliance with the qualifications and other rules of the IRC.(5) The board may establish procedures to provide for the lawful payment of benefits, including alternate payees under this act or other law.(6) The board shall determine, after reviewing applicable law, what constitutes a termination of county service.20250HB0418PN0393 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) The board may establish procedures for distributions of small accounts as required or permitted by the IRC.(8) The board may establish procedures in the plan document or adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as it deems necessary for the administration and management of the plan, including establishing:(i) Procedures for eligible participants to change voluntary contribution amounts or investment choices on a periodic basis or make other elections regarding participation in the plan.(ii) Procedures for deducting mandatory pickup participant contributions and voluntary contributions from a participant's compensation.(iii) Procedures for rollovers and trustee-to-trustee transfers allowed under the IRC and permitted as part of the plan.(iv) Standards and criteria for disclosing to the participants the anticipated and actual income attributable to amounts invested, property rights and all fees, costs and expenses to be made against amounts deferred to cover the fees, costs and expenses of administering and managing the plan or trust.(v) Procedures, standards and criteria for the making of distributions from the plan upon termination from employment or death or in other circumstances consistent with the purpose of the plan.(9) The board may waive any reporting or information requirement contained in this act if the board determines that the information is not needed for the administration of the plan.(10) The board may contract any services and duties in lieu 20250HB0418PN0393 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of staff, except final adjudications and as prohibited by law. A duty or responsibility of the board not required by law to be performed by the board may be delegated to a third-party provider subject to appeal to the board.(11) The board may provide that any duties of the employer or information provided by the participant to the employer be performed or received directly by the board.(12) The board shall ensure that participants are provided with educational materials about investment options and choices.(m) The board, the Commonwealth, an employer or other political subdivision shall not be responsible for any investment or other loss incurred under the plan or for the failure of any investment to earn any specific or expected return or to earn as much as any other investment opportunity or to cost less than any other investment opportunity, whether or not the other opportunity was offered to participants in the plan.(n) (1) All contributions, interest and investment earnings shall be invested based on a participant's investment allocation choices, if the board may provide for a default investment option. All investment allocation choices shall be credited proportionally between participant contributions and employer defined contributions. Each participant shall be credited individually with the amount of contributions, interest and investment earnings.(2) Investment of contributions by any corporation, institution, insurance company, custodial bank or other entity that the board has approved shall not be unreasonably delayed, and in no case may the investment of contributions be delayed more than thirty days from the date of payroll deduction or the 20250HB0418PN0393 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 date voluntary contributions are made to the date that funds are invested. Any interest earned on the funds pending investment shall be used to pay administrative costs and fees that would otherwise be required to be borne by participants who are then participating in the plan or paid by appropriations from the county general fund.(o) All fees, costs and expenses of establishing and administering the plan and the trust and investing the assets of the trust shall be borne by the participants and paid from assessments against the balances of the individual investment accounts as established by the board, except that the fees, costs and expenses of establishing and administering the plan and the trust shall be paid by the county through annual appropriations.(p) (1) All payments under this section shall start and be made in compliance with the required beginning date, minimum distribution requirements and incidental death benefit rules of IRC § 401(a).(2) (i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii), a contribution or benefit related to the plan may not exceed any limitation under IRC § 415 with respect to a governmental plan which is in effect on the date the contribution or benefit payment takes effect.(ii) An increase in a limitation under IRC § 415 shall apply to all participants on and after the effective date of this subparagraph.(iii) An increase in benefits on or after the effective date of this subparagraph for a participant in the plan shall be authorized and apply to the fullest extent allowed by law.(q) As used in this section, the following words and phrases 20250HB0418PN0393 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Governmental plan" has the same meaning as the term has in IRC § 414(d)."IRC" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 ( 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.)."Participant" means a county employe."Plan" means the County Employees' Defined Contribution Plan established under subsection (a)."Trust" means the County Employees' Defined Contribution Trust established under subsection (b).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0418PN0393 - 11 - 123456789101112